West Virginia, session 2026, SB503.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. DISPLAY OF THE NATIONAL MOTTO IN STATE BUILDINGS. §5-10-1. Short Title. This act may be cited as the “State Buildings National Motto Display Act.” §5-10-2. Definitions. As used in this article:(1) “Agency office” means the individual office, suite, division space, or departmental area within a state office building that is assigned to or occupied by a specific state agency, division, board, commission, or office.(2) “National motto” means the official motto of the United States of America, “In God We Trust.”(3) “State office building” means any building owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the State of West Virginia that is used for the conduct of official state business and that houses one or more state agencies, divisions, boards, commissions, or offices. §5-10-3. Required display in state office buildings. (a) Each state office building shall display the national motto in a conspicuous public location.(b) The display shall be visible to members of the public. §5-10-4. Required display within agency offices. (a) Each agency office shall display the national motto in a conspicuous location.(b) Each agency office shall be independently responsible for compliance. §5-10-5. Display specifications. (a) Displays shall be durable, no smaller than eight and one-half inches by eleven inches and may include a depiction of the United States flag.(b) No additional language or imagery is permitted. §5-10-6. Funding restrictions. (a) No state funds may be expended.(b) Agencies may accept private donations. §5-10-7. Administrative guidance. (a) The Department of Administration may issue nonbinding guidance.(b) Effective Date: July 1, 2026.